Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2915
Director; determine maximum exposure to loss; approve forms, premium rates, and limits of indemnity; considerations.

For purposes of sections 44-2901 to 44-2918, the director shall have the authority to determine the maximum exposure to loss on any risk to be written by the association. All policy forms, premium rates and limits of indemnity shall be filed with and subject to the approval of the director. In approving premium rates to be charged for malpractice insurance, limits of indemnity and members and risks outside this state, the director shall give due consideration to past and prospective loss and expense experience for medical malpractice insurance written and to be written, trends in the frequency and severity of the loss, the investment income of the association, and such other information as the director may deem relevant.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 15.